src/import/nouns.lexc
LEXICON PlainNouns


1/16-finaal+N:1/16-fin´aal TAUD ;
1/2-finaal+N:1/2-fin´aal TAUD ;
1/4-finaal+N:1/4-fin´aal TAUD ;
1/8-finaal+N:1/8-fin´aal TAUD ;
Eestimaa=rahvas+N:Eesti#maa=r´ahva KOTKAS ;
aabe+N:´aaP2e PINGE ;
aabits+N:aabits MAGUS ;
aabitsajünger+N:aabitsa#j´üngE2r REDEL ;
aabitsajüts+N:aabitsa#j´üt,s TAUD ;
aabitsaraamat+N:aabitsa#raamat VIRSIK ;
@P.Stem.Nom@aabitsatarkus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@aabitsa#t´arkus SUULINE ;
aabitsatõde+N:aabitsa#tõD1e KAVA ;
aadamaõun+N:´aadama#´õun%>%{pl.u%}%{rare%} PIIM ;
aadamaülikond+N:´aadama#`ülik´onD1%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV ;
aade+N:´aaT2e PINGE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@aadel+N:@P.Stem.Nom@´aadE2l REDEL ;
aadelkond+N:´aadelk´onD1%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV ;
@P.Stem.Nom@aader+N:@P.Stem.Nom@´aadE2r REDEL ;
aadlidaam+N:´aadli#d´aam TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@aadlik+N:@P.Stem.Nom@´aadl´ik ÄMBLIK ;
aadlimees+N:´aadli#me MEES ;
@P.Stem.Nom@aadliseisus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@´aadli#s´eisus SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@aadress+N:@P.Stem.Nom@´aadr´es,s TAUD ;
aafriklane+N:aafriklane OLULINE ;
aafriklanna+N:aafriklanna PERE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@aagenpits+N:@P.Stem.Nom@`aagenp´it,s TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@aaker+N:@P.Stem.Nom@´aakE2r REDEL ;
aaloe+N:´aal´oe ARMEE ;
@D.Case.Nom@aam+N:@D.Case.Nom@´aam TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@aamen+N:@P.Stem.Nom@´aamen REDEL ;
aamissepp+N:aamis#s´epp%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
aampalk+N:´aam#p´al,k TAUD ;
aanispits+N:aan,is#p´it,s TAUD ;
aapestik+N:´aapest´ik ELANIK ;
@P.Stem.Single@aar+N:@P.Stem.Single@´aar TAUD ;
aara+N:aara PERE ;
aardekütt+N:´aarde#k´üt,t TAUD ;
aardla+N:´aardla AASTA ;
aare+N:´aarD1e PINGE ;
aaria+N:´aaria AASTA ;
aarialane+N:´aarialane OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@aas+N:@P.Stem.Nom@´aas%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
aasialane+N:´aasialane OLULINE ;
aasimine+N:´aas,imine OLULINE ;
aasta+N:´aasta AASTA ;
aastaaeg+N:´aasta#´aE4G1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
aastaarv+N:´aasta#´arv%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
aastaeelarve+N:´aasta#´eel#´arve PINGE ;
aastakäik+N:´aasta#k´äik%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
aastakäive+N:´aasta#k´äiB2e PINGE ;
aastakümme+N:´aasta#kümmE2 SEEME ;
aastalehm+N:´aasta#l´ehm%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
aastalõpp+N:´aasta#l´õpp%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
aastamaks+N:´aasta#m´aks%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
aastamakse+N:´aasta#m´akse PINGE ;
aastamiljon+N:´aasta#m´il,jon REDEL ;
aastanumber+N:´aasta#n´umbE2r REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@aastanäitus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@´aasta#n´äitus SUULINE ;
aastapalk+N:´aasta#p´alk%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
aastaplaan+N:´aasta#pl´aan, TAUD ;
aastapreemia+N:´aasta#pr´eemia AASTA ;
aastapäev+N:´aasta#p´äev%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV ;
aastapäevakõne+N:´aasta#päeva#kõne PERE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@aastapäevaüritus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@´aasta#päeva#üritus OLULINE ;
aastaring+N:´aasta#r´ing TAUD ;
aastarõngas+N:´aasta#r´õnga KOTKAS ;
aastasada+N:´aasta#saJ1D1a%>%{pl.u%} SADA ;
@P.Stem.Single@aastatetagune+N:@P.Stem.Single@´aastate#tagune SOOLANE ;
aastatuhat+N:´aasta#tuha TUHAT ;
@P.Stem.Nom@aastavahetus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@´aasta#vahetus OLULINE ;
aateinimene+N:´aate#inimene OLULINE ;
aatekaaslane+N:´aate#k´aaslane SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@aatelisus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@´aatelisus OLULINE ;
aatemees+N:´aate#me MEES ;
aatleja+N:´aatleja AASTA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@aatom+N:@P.Stem.Nom@´aatom REDEL ;
aatomienergia+N:´aatomi#en´ergia AASTA ;
aatomipomm+N:´aatomi#p´omm TAUD ;
aatomisõda+N:´aatomi#sõJ1D1a%>%{pl.u%}%{stemill%} KAVA ;
aatomkütus+N:´aatom#kütus SOOLANE ;
aatrium+N:´aatrium MUUSEUM ;
aažio+N:´aažio AASTA ;
abajas+N:abaja LOHAKAS ;
abakala+N:aba#kala%>%{pl.u%} KAVA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@abakus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@abakus OLULINE ;
abaluu+N:aba#l´uu%>%{id%} PUU ;
@P.Stem.Nom@abasiin+N:@P.Stem.Nom@abas´iin TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@abažuur+N:@P.Stem.Nom@`abaž´uur TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@abdoomen+N:@P.Stem.Nom@abd´oomen REDEL ;
abee+N:ab´ee%>%{id%}%{rare%} ARMEE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@aberratsioon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@aberratsi´oon TAUD ;
abessiinlane+N:abess´iinlane SUULINE ;
abessiinlanna+N:abessiinlanna PERE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@abessiiv+N:@P.Stem.Nom@`abess´iiv TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@abhaas+N:@P.Stem.Nom@abh´aas TAUD ;
abi+N:abi%{stemill%} KAVA ;
abiandja+N:abi#´an,dja AASTA ;
abiandmine+N:abi#´andmine OLULINE ;
abidirektor+N:abi#dir´ektor REDEL ;
abiellumine+N:abi#´ellumine OLULINE ;
abiellumisettepanek+N:abi#´ellumis#´ette#panek VIRSIK ;
@P.Stem.Nom@abiellumus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@abi#´ellumus OLULINE ;
abielu+N:abi#elu%{stemill%} KAVA ;
abieluettepanek+N:abi#elu#´ette#panek VIRSIK ;
abieluinimene+N:abi#elu#inimene OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@abielulahutus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@abi#elu#lahutus OLULINE ;
abielulaps+N:abi#elu#l´aP1s LAPS ;
abielumees+N:abi#elu#me MEES ;
abielunaine+N:abi#elu#naine NAINE ;
abielupaar+N:abi#elu#p´aar TAUD ;
abielupool+N:abi#elu#p´ool%{stemill%} KEEL ;
abielurahvas+N:abi#elu#r´ahva KOTKAS ;
abielurikkuja+N:abi#elu#r´ikkuja AASTA ;
abielusadam+N:abi#elu#sadam MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@abieluseisus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@abi#elu#s´eisus SUULINE ;
abieluside+N:abi#elu#side HAARE ;
abielusõrmus+N:abi#elu#sõrmus SOOLANE ;
abieluvoodi+N:abi#elu#v´ood,i AASTA ;
abieluõnn+N:abi#elu#´õn,n%>%{pl.i%}%{rare%} EIT ;
abikaasa+N:abi#kaasa PERE ;
abikaaslane+N:abi#k´aaslane SUULINE ;
abikomissar+N:abi#komissar TAUD ;
abiksolija+N:abiks#olija AASTA ;
abiline+N:abiline OLULINE ;
abilinnapea+N:abi#linna#p´E6A6%>%{id%} PUU ;
abimaavanem+N:abi#m´aa#vanem MAGUS ;
abimaterjal+N:abi#materjal TAUD ;
abimees+N:abi#me MEES ;
abinõu+N:abi#n´õu KAVA ;
abiogenees+N:abio#gen´ees TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@abioos+N:@P.Stem.Nom@abi´oos TAUD ;
abiotsija+N:abi#´ot,sija AASTA ;
abipakett+N:abi#pak´et,t TAUD ;
abipaluja+N:abi#paluja AASTA ;
abipalve+N:abi#p´alve PINGE ;
abiprefekt+N:abi#pref´ekt TAUD ;
abiprogramm+N:abi#progr´amm TAUD ;
abiraha+N:abi#raha KAVA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@abisaadetis+N:@P.Stem.Nom@abi#saadetis OLULINE ;
abistaja+N:abistaja AASTA ;
abistamine+N:abistamine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@abistus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@abistus OLULINE ;
abisõna+N:abi#sõna%>%{pl.u%} KAVA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@abiteenistus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@abi#teenistus OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@abiturient+N:@P.Stem.Nom@abituri´en,t TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@abitus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@abitus OLULINE ;
abituurium+N:abit´uurium MUUSEUM ;
abivahend+N:abi#vahend REDEL ;
abivajaja+N:abi#vajaja AASTA ;
abivallavanem+N:abi#valla#vanem MAGUS ;
@P.Stem.Nom@abivalmidus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@abi#v´al,midus OLULINE ;
abivägi+N:abi#väG1%{stemill%} NIMI ;
abiõpetaja+N:abi#õpetaja AASTA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@ablatiiv+N:@P.Stem.Nom@`ablat´iiv TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@abnormsus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@abn´ormsus SUULINE ;
abolitsionism+N:abolitsion´ism TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@abonement+N:@P.Stem.Nom@abonem´en,t TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@abonent+N:@P.Stem.Nom@abon´en,t TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@aborigeen+N:@P.Stem.Nom@aborig´een TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@abort+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ab´ort TAUD ;
abrakadabra+N:abrakad`abra RUBLA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@abrasiiv+N:@P.Stem.Nom@abras´iiv TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@abrasioon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@abrasi´oon TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@abreviatuur+N:@P.Stem.Nom@abreviat´uur TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@absats+N:@P.Stem.Nom@´abs´ats TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@absint+N:@P.Stem.Nom@abs´in,t TAUD ;
absolutism+N:absolut´ism TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@absolutist+N:@P.Stem.Nom@absolut´ist TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@absoluut+N:@P.Stem.Nom@absol´uut TAUD ;
absoluutarv+N:absol´uut#´arv%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
@P.Stem.Nom@absoluutsus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@absol´uutsus SUULINE ;
absorbeerumine+N:absorb´eerumine OLULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@absorbent+N:@P.Stem.Nom@absorb´en,t TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@absorbtsioon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@absorbtsi´oon TAUD ;
abstraheerimine+N:abstrah´eerimine OLULINE ;
abstraheeritu+N:abstraheeritu AASTA ;
@P.Stem.Nom@abstraheeritus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@abstraheeritus OLULINE ;
abstraktsionism+N:abstraktsion´ism TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@abstraktsioon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@abstraktsi´oon TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@abstraktsus+N:@P.Stem.Nom@abstr´aktsus SUULINE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@abstsess+N:@P.Stem.Nom@absts´ess TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@abstsiss+N:@P.Stem.Nom@absts´iss TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@absurd+N:@P.Stem.Nom@abs´urd TAUD ;
@R.Part.One@abt+N:@R.Part.One@´abt TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@abtiss+N:@P.Stem.Nom@abt´iss TAUD ;
abtkond+N:´abtk´onD1%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV ;
abukasukas+N:abu#kasuka LOHAKAS ;
adaadžo+N:adaadžo PERE ;
@P.Stem.Nom@adaptatsioon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@adaptatsi´oon TAUD ;
@P.Stem.Nom@adapter+N:@P.Stem.Nom@ad´apter REDEL ;
@P.Stem.Nom@adaptsioon+N:@P.Stem.Nom@adaptsi´oon TAUD ;
